Vermont, session 2025-2026, S284.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 4202a is added to read:
§ 4202a. DRUG USE HEALTH AND SAFETY ADVISORY BOARD
(a) There is hereby created the Drug Use Health and Safety Advisory
Board composed of experts in the fields of general and behavioral health care,
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 2 of 35
substance use disorder treatment, harm reduction services, and drug user
communities.
(b) The primary objectives of the Advisory Board shall be to determine the
benchmark personal use supply for each regulated drug. The benchmarks
determined pursuant to this subsection shall be determined with a goal of
preventing and reducing the criminalization of personal drug possession and
use.
(c) The Advisory Board shall be composed of the following 13 members:
(1) two consumer representatives who have lived experience in drug use
and consumption practices, appointed by the Senate Committee on
Committees;
(2) two representatives from harm reduction service providers,
appointed by the Senate Committee on Committees;
(3) one expert on substance use disorder treatment and recovery, which
may include a medical practitioner providing medication for opioid use
disorder, appointed by the Senate Committee on Committees;
(4) one academic expert specializing in human behavior, addiction, and
drug policy, appointed by the Senate Committee on Committees;
(5) two consumer representatives who have lived experience in drug use
and consumption practices, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 3 of 35
(6) two representatives from harm reduction service providers,
appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(7) one expert on substance use disorder treatment and recovery, which
may include a medical practitioner providing medication for opioid use
disorder, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(8) one academic expert specializing in human behavior, addiction, and
drug policy, appointed by the Speaker of the House; and
(9) one expert on legal reform, appointed by the Center for Justice
Reform at Vermont Law and Graduate School.
(d) Upon convening, the members of the Advisory Board shall elect a chair
by majority vote and shall fill any vacancy of the Chair by the same. A
majority of members shall constitute a quorum.
(e) On or before January 1, 2027, the Advisory Board shall provide the
recommended quantities for benchmark personal use supply for each category
of regulated drug listed in subdivision 4201(29) of this title.
(f) The Advisory Board shall convene at least one time per year to review
benchmarks established pursuant to this section and recommend any necessary
amendments. The Chair of the Advisory Board may, with the consent of a
majority of members, convene additional meetings to receive testimony from
experts on drug use, substance use disorder, and medical research or practice
relating to any specific drug.
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 4 of 35
(g) The Department shall initiate rulemaking to adopt benchmark personal
use supplies not later than 90 days following the receipt of recommendations
from the Advisory Board. The Department shall give full consideration to the
recommendations of the Advisory Board and provide detailed explanations for
any deviations from the recommendations of the Advisory Board in the
proposed rules.
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 4230 is amended to read:
§ 4230. CANNABIS
(a) Possession and cultivation.
(1) No person shall knowingly and unlawfully possess more than one
ounce of cannabis or more than five grams of hashish or cultivate more than
two mature cannabis plants or four immature cannabis plants. A person who
violates this subdivision shall be assessed a civil penalty as follows:
(A) not more than $100.00 for a first offense;
(B) not more than $200.00 for a second offense; and
(C) not more than $500.00 for a third or subsequent offense.
(2)(A) No person shall knowingly and unlawfully possess two ounces or
more of cannabis or ten 10 grams or more of hashish or more than three mature
cannabis plants or six immature cannabis plants. For a first offense under this
subdivision (2), a person shall be provided the opportunity to participate in the
Court Diversion Program unless the prosecutor states on the record why a
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 5 of 35
referral to the Court Diversion Program would not serve the ends of justice. A
person convicted of a first offense under this subdivision (2) shall be
imprisoned not more than six months or fined not more than $500.00, or both.
(B) A person convicted of a second or subsequent offense of
violating subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2) shall be imprisoned not more
than two years or fined not more than $2,000.00, or both.
(C) Upon an adjudication of guilt for a first or second offense under
this subdivision (2), the court may defer sentencing as provided in 13 V.S.A.
§ 7041, except that the court may in its discretion defer sentence without the
filing of a presentence investigation report and except that sentence may be
imposed at any time within two years from and after the date of entry of
deferment. The court may, prior to sentencing, order that the defendant submit
to a drug assessment screening, which may be considered at sentencing in the
same manner as a presentence report.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing eight ounces of
cannabis or 1.4 ounces of hashish or knowingly and unlawfully cultivating
more than four mature cannabis plants or eight immature cannabis plants shall
be imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or
both.
(4) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing more than one pound
of cannabis or more than 2.8 ounces of hashish or knowingly and unlawfully
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 6 of 35
cultivating more than six mature cannabis plants or 12 immature cannabis
plants shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than
$10,000.00, or both.
(5) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing more than 10 pounds
of cannabis or more than one pound of hashish or knowingly and unlawfully
cultivating more than 12 mature cannabis plants or 24 immature cannabis
plants shall be imprisoned not more than 15 years or fined not more than
$500,000.00, or both.
(6) If a court fails to provide the defendant with notice of collateral
consequences in accordance with 13 V.S.A. § 8005(b) and the defendant later
at any time shows that the plea and conviction for a violation of this subsection
may have or has had a negative consequence, the court, upon the defendant’s
motion, shall vacate the judgment and permit the defendant to withdraw the
plea or admission and enter a plea of not guilty. Failure of the court to advise
the defendant of a particular collateral consequence shall not support a motion
to vacate.
(7) The amounts of cannabis in this subsection shall not include
cannabis cultivated, harvested, and stored in accordance with section 4230e of
this title.
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 7 of 35
(b) Selling or dispensing.
(1) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling cannabis or hashish shall
be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or
both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing more than
one ounce of cannabis or five grams or more of hashish shall be imprisoned
not more than five years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing one pound
or more of cannabis or 2.8 ounces or more of hashish shall be imprisoned not
more than 15 years or fined not more than $500,000.00, or both.
(4) A person 21 years of age or older may dispense one ounce or less of
cannabis or five grams or less of hashish to another person who is 21 years of
age or older, provided that the dispensing is not advertised or promoted to the
public. [Repealed.]
(c) Trafficking. A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing 50 pounds
or more of cannabis or five pounds or more of hashish with the intent to sell or
dispense the cannabis or hashish shall be imprisoned not more than 30 years or
fined not more than $1,000,000.00, or both. There shall be a permissive
inference that a person who possesses 50 pounds or more of cannabis or five
pounds or more of hashish intends to sell or dispense the cannabis or hashish.
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 8 of 35
(d) Cannabis-infused products. Only the portion of a cannabis-infused
product that is attributable to cannabis shall count toward the possession limits
of this section. The weight of cannabis that is attributable to cannabis-infused
products shall be determined according to methods set forth in rule by the
Cannabis Control Board.
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 4230f is amended to read:
§ 4230f. DISPENSING CANNABIS TO A PERSON UNDER 21 YEARS OF
AGE; CRIMINAL OFFENSE
(a) No person shall:
(1) dispense cannabis to a person under 21 years of age; or
(2) knowingly enable the consumption of cannabis by a person under 21
years of age.
(b) As used in this section, “enable the consumption of cannabis” means
creating a direct and immediate opportunity for a person to consume cannabis.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, a person who
violates subsection (a) of this section shall be imprisoned not more than two
years or fined not more than $2,000.00, or both.
(d) A person who violates subsection (a) of this section, where the person
under 21 years of age while operating a motor vehicle on a public highway
causes death or serious bodily injury to himself or herself or to another person
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 9 of 35
as a result of the violation, shall be imprisoned not more than five years or
fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.
(e)(1) Subsections (a)-(d) of this section shall not apply to a person under
21 years of age who dispenses cannabis to a person under 21 years of age or
who knowingly enables the consumption of cannabis by a person under 21
years of age.
(2) A person who is 18, 19, or 20 years of age who knowingly dispenses
cannabis to a person who is 18, 19, or 20 years of age commits a civil violation
and shall be referred to the Court Diversion Program for the purpose of
enrollment in the Youth Substance Awareness Safety Program in accordance
with the provisions of section 4230b of this title and shall be subject to the
penalties in that section for failure to complete the program successfully.
(3) A person 18, 19, or 20 years of age who knowingly dispenses to a
person under 18 years of age who is at least three years that person’s junior
shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not more than five years in
accordance with section 4237 of this title.
(4) A person who is 19 years of age who knowingly dispenses to a
person 17 years of age or a person who is 18 years of age who knowingly
dispenses cannabis to a person who is 16 or 17 years of age commits a
misdemeanor crime and shall be fined not more than $500.00.
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 10 of 35
(5) A person who is under 18 years of age who knowingly dispenses
cannabis to another person who is under 18 years of age commits a delinquent
act and shall be subject to 33 V.S.A. chapter 52.
(f) This section shall not apply to a dispensary that lawfully provides
cannabis to a registered patient or caregiver or to a registered caregiver who
provides cannabis to a registered patient pursuant to chapter 86 of this title.
(g) The provisions of this section do not limit or restrict the prosecution for
other offenses arising out of the same conduct, nor shall they limit or restrict
defenses under common law. [Repealed.]
Sec. 4. 18 V.S.A. § 4231 is amended to read:
§ 4231. COCAINE
(a) Possession.
(1) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing cocaine shall be
imprisoned not more than one year six months or fined not more than
$2,000.00 $500.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing cocaine in an
amount consisting of 2.5 grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing cocaine shall be imprisoned
not more than five two years or fined not more than $100,000.00 $5,000.00, or
both.
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 11 of 35
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing cocaine in an
amount consisting of one ounce or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing cocaine shall be imprisoned
not more than 10 years or fined not more than $250,000.00, or both.
(4) [Repealed.]
(b) Selling or dispensing.
(1) A person knowingly and unlawfully dispensing cocaine shall be
imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $75,000.00, or
both. A person knowingly and unlawfully selling cocaine shall be imprisoned
not more than five years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing cocaine in
an amount consisting of 2.5 grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing cocaine shall be imprisoned
not more than 10 years or fined not more than $250,000.00, or both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing cocaine in
an amount consisting of one ounce or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing cocaine shall be imprisoned
not more than 20 years or fined not more than $1,000,000.00, or both.
(c) Trafficking.
(1) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing cocaine in an
amount consisting of 150 grams or more of one or more preparations,
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 12 of 35
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing cocaine with the intent to sell
or dispense the cocaine shall be imprisoned not more than 30 years or fined not
more than $1,000,000.00, or both. There shall be a permissive inference that a
person who possesses cocaine in an amount consisting of 150 grams or more of
one or more preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances containing
cocaine intends to sell or dispense the cocaine. The amount of possessed
cocaine under this subdivision to sustain a charge of conspiracy under 13
V.S.A. § 1404 shall be not less than 400 grams in the aggregate.
(2) [Repealed.]
Sec. 5. 18 V.S.A. § 4232 is amended to read:
§ 4232. LSD
(a) Possession.
(1) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing lysergic acid
diethylamide shall be imprisoned not more than one year six months or fined
not more than $2,000.00 $500.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing lysergic acid
diethylamide in an amount consisting of 100 milligrams or more of one or
more preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances containing lysergic
acid diethylamide shall be imprisoned not more than five two years or fined
not more than $25,000.00 $2,000.00, or both.
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 13 of 35
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing lysergic acid
diethylamide in an amount consisting of one gram or more of one or more
preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances containing lysergic acid
diethylamide shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more
than $100,000.00, or both.
(4) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing lysergic acid
diethylamide in an amount consisting of 10 grams or more of one or more
preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances containing lysergic acid
diethylamide shall be imprisoned not more than 20 years or fined not more
than $500,000.00, or both.
(b) Selling or dispensing.
(1) A person knowingly and unlawfully dispensing lysergic acid
diethylamide shall be imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more
than $25,000.00, or both. A person knowingly and unlawfully selling lysergic
acid diethylamide shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not
more than $25,000.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing lysergic
acid diethylamide in an amount consisting of 100 milligrams or more of one or
more preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances containing lysergic
acid diethylamide shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not
more than $100,000.00, or both.
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 14 of 35
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing lysergic
acid diethylamide in an amount consisting of one gram or more of one or more
preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances containing lysergic acid
diethylamide shall be imprisoned not more than 20 years or fined not more
than $500,000.00, or both.
Sec. 6. 18 V.S.A. § 4233 is amended to read:
§ 4233. HEROIN
(a) Possession.
(1) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing heroin shall be
imprisoned not more than one year six months or fined not more than
$2,000.00 $500.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing heroin in an amount
consisting of 200 milligrams one gram or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing heroin shall be imprisoned not
more than five two years or fined not more than $100,000.00 $5,000.00, or
both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing heroin in an amount
consisting of one gram 2.5 grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing heroin shall be imprisoned not
more than 10 five years or fined not more than $250,000.00, or both.
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 15 of 35
(4) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing heroin in an amount
consisting of two five grams or more of one or more preparations, compounds,
mixtures, or substances containing heroin shall be imprisoned not more than 20
years or fined not more than $1,000,000.00, or both.
(b) Selling or dispensing.
(1) A person knowingly and unlawfully dispensing heroin shall be
imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $75,000.00, or
both. A person knowingly and unlawfully selling heroin shall be imprisoned
not more than five years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing heroin in
an amount consisting of 200 milligrams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing heroin shall be imprisoned not
more than 10 years or fined not more than $250,000.00, or both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing heroin in
an amount consisting of one gram or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing heroin shall be imprisoned not
more than 20 years or fined not more than $1,000,000.00, or both.
(c) Trafficking. A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing heroin in
an amount consisting of 3.5 seven grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing heroin with the intent to sell or
dispense the heroin shall be imprisoned not more than 30 years or fined not
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 16 of 35
more than $1,000,000.00, or both. There shall be a permissive inference that a
person who possesses heroin in an amount of 3.5 grams or more of one or
more preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances containing heroin
intends to sell or dispense the heroin. The amount of possessed heroin under
this subsection to sustain a charge of conspiracy under 13 V.S.A. § 1404 shall
be no not less than 10 grams in the aggregate.
(d) Transportation into the State. In addition to any other penalties
provided by law, a person knowingly and unlawfully transporting one gram or
more of heroin into Vermont with the intent to sell or dispense the heroin shall
be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or
both.
Sec. 7. 18 V.S.A. § 4233a is amended to read:
§ 4233a. FENTANYL
(a) Selling or dispensing.
(1) A person knowingly and unlawfully dispensing fentanyl shall be
imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $75,000.00, or
both. A person knowingly and unlawfully selling fentanyl shall be imprisoned
not more than five years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing fentanyl in
an amount consisting of four milligrams or more of one or more preparations,
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 17 of 35
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing fentanyl shall be imprisoned
not more than 10 years or fined not more than $250,000.00, or both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing fentanyl in
an amount consisting of 20 milligrams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing fentanyl shall be imprisoned
not more than 20 years or fined not more than $1,000,000.00, or both.
(4) In lieu of a charge under this subsection, but in addition to any other
penalties provided by law, a person knowingly and unlawfully selling or
dispensing any regulated drug containing a detectable amount of fentanyl shall
be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $250,000.00, or
both.
(b) Trafficking. A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing fentanyl in
an amount consisting of 70 milligrams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing fentanyl with the intent to sell
or dispense the fentanyl shall be imprisoned not more than 30 years or fined
not more than $1,000,000.00, or both. There shall be a permissive inference
that a person who possesses fentanyl in an amount of 70 milligrams or more of
one or more preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances containing
fentanyl intends to sell or dispense the fentanyl. The amount of possessed
fentanyl under this subsection to sustain a charge of conspiracy under 13
V.S.A. § 1404 shall be not less than 70 milligrams in the aggregate.
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 18 of 35
(c) Transportation into the State. In addition to any other penalties
provided by law, a person knowingly and unlawfully transporting more than 20
milligrams of fentanyl into Vermont with the intent to sell or dispense the
fentanyl shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than
$100,000.00, or both.
(d) Definition. As used in this section, “knowingly” means:
(1) the defendant had actual knowledge that one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances contained the regulated drug identified in
the applicable section of this chapter; or
(2) the defendant:
(A) was aware that there is a high probability that one or more
preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances contained the regulated drug
identified in the applicable section of this chapter; and
(B) took deliberate actions to avoid learning that one or more
preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances contained the regulated drug
identified in the applicable section of this chapter.
Sec. 8. 18 V.S.A. § 4233b is amended to read:
§ 4233b. XYLAZINE
(a) No person shall dispense or sell xylazine except as provided in
subsection (b) of this section.
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 19 of 35
(b) The following are permitted activities related to xylazine:
(1) dispensing or prescribing for, or administration to, a nonhuman
species a drug containing xylazine approved by the Secretary of Health and
Human Services pursuant to section 512 of the Federal Food, Drug, and
Cosmetic Act as provided in 21 U.S.C. § 360b;
(2) dispensing or prescribing for, or administration to, a nonhuman
species permissible pursuant to section 512(a)(4) of the Federal Food, Drug,
and Cosmetic Act as provided in 21 U.S.C. § 360b(a)(4);
(3) manufacturing, distribution, or use of xylazine as an active
pharmaceutical ingredient for manufacturing an animal drug approved under
section 512 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act as provided in 21
U.S.C. § 360b or issued an investigation use exemption pursuant to section
512(j);
(4) manufacturing, distribution, or use of a xylazine bulk chemical for
pharmaceutical compounding by licensed pharmacists or veterinarians; and
(5) any other use approved or permissible under the Federal Food, Drug,
and Cosmetic Act.
(c) A person knowingly and unlawfully dispensing xylazine shall be
imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $75,000.00, or
both. A person knowingly and unlawfully selling xylazine shall be imprisoned
not more than five years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or both.
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 20 of 35
(d) As used in this section, “knowingly” means:
(1) the defendant had actual knowledge that one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances contained xylazine; or
(2) the defendant:
(A) was aware that there is a high probability that one or more
preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances contained xylazine; and
(B) took deliberate actions to avoid learning that one or more
preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances contained xylazine.
Sec. 9. 18 V.S.A. § 4234 is amended to read:
§ 4234. DEPRESSANT, STIMULANT, AND NARCOTIC DRUGS
(a) Possession.
(1)(A) Except as provided by subdivision (B) of this subdivision (1), a
person knowingly and unlawfully possessing a depressant, stimulant, or
narcotic drug, other than heroin or cocaine, shall be imprisoned not more than
one year six months or fined not more than $2,000.00 $500.00, or both.
(B) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing 224 milligrams
or less of buprenorphine shall not be punished in accordance with subdivision
(A) of this subdivision (1).
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing a depressant,
stimulant, or narcotic drug, other than heroin or cocaine, consisting of 100
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 21 of 35
times a benchmark unlawful dosage or its equivalent shall be imprisoned not
more than five two years or fined not more than $25,000.00 $2,000.00, or both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing a depressant,
stimulant, or narcotic drug, other than heroin or cocaine, consisting of 1,000
times a benchmark unlawful dosage or its equivalent shall be imprisoned not
more than 10 years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or both.
(4) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing a depressant,
stimulant, or narcotic drug, other than heroin or cocaine, consisting of 10,000
times a benchmark unlawful dosage or its equivalent shall be imprisoned not
more than 20 years or fined not more than $500,000.00, or both.
(b) Selling or dispensing.
(1) A person knowingly and unlawfully dispensing a depressant,
stimulant, or narcotic drug, other than fentanyl, heroin, or cocaine, shall be
imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $75,000.00, or
both. A person knowingly and unlawfully selling a depressant, stimulant, or
narcotic drug, other than fentanyl, cocaine, or heroin, shall be imprisoned not
more than five two years or fined not more than $25,000.00 $5,000.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing a
depressant, stimulant, or narcotic drug, other than fentanyl, heroin, or cocaine,
consisting of 100 times a benchmark unlawful dosage or its equivalent shall be
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 22 of 35
imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or
both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing a
depressant, stimulant, or narcotic drug, other than fentanyl, heroin, or cocaine,
consisting of 1,000 times a benchmark unlawful dosage or its equivalent shall
be imprisoned not more than 20 years or fined not more than $500,000.00, or
both.
(4) As used in this subsection, “knowingly” means:
(A) the defendant had actual knowledge that one or more
preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances contained the regulated drug
identified in the applicable section of this chapter; or
(B) the defendant:
(i) was aware that there is a high probability that one or more
preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances contained the regulated drug
identified in the applicable section of this chapter; and
(ii) took deliberate actions to avoid learning that one or more
preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances contained the regulated drug
identified in the applicable section of this chapter.
(c) Possession of buprenorphine by a person under 21 years of age.
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, a person
under 21 years of age who knowingly and unlawfully possesses 224
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 23 of 35
milligrams or less of buprenorphine commits a civil violation and shall be
subject to the provisions of section 4230b of this title.
(2) A person under 16 years of age who knowingly and unlawfully
possesses 224 milligrams or less of buprenorphine commits a delinquent act
and shall be subject to the provisions of section 4230j of this title.
Sec. 10. 18 V.S.A. § 4234a is amended to read:
§ 4234a. METHAMPHETAMINE
(a) Possession.
(1) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing methamphetamine
shall be imprisoned not more than one year six months or fined not more than
$2,000.00 $500.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing methamphetamine in
an amount consisting of 2.5 grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing methamphetamine shall be
imprisoned not more than five two years or fined not more than $100,000.00
$5,000.00, or both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing methamphetamine in
an amount consisting of 25 grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing methamphetamine shall be
imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than $250,000.00, or
both.
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 24 of 35
(b) Selling and dispensing.
(1) A person knowingly and unlawfully dispensing methamphetamine
shall be imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than
$75,000.00, or both. A person knowingly and unlawfully selling
methamphetamine shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not
more than $100,000.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing
methamphetamine in an amount consisting of 2.5 grams or more of one or
more preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances containing
methamphetamine shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not
more than $250,000.00, or both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing
methamphetamine in an amount consisting of 25 grams or more of one or more
preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances containing
methamphetamine shall be imprisoned not more than 20 years or fined not
more than $1,000,000.00, or both.
(c) Trafficking. A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing
methamphetamine in an amount consisting of 300 grams or more of one or
more preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances containing
methamphetamine with the intent to sell or dispense the methamphetamine
shall be imprisoned not more than 30 years or fined not more than
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 25 of 35
$1,000,000.00, or both. There shall be a permissive inference that a person
who possesses methamphetamine in an amount consisting of 300 grams or
more of one or more preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances
containing methamphetamine intends to sell or dispense the methamphetamine.
The amount of possessed methamphetamine under this subsection to sustain a
charge of conspiracy under 13 V.S.A. § 1404 shall be no not less than 800
grams in the aggregate.
Sec. 11. 18 V.S.A. § 4234b is amended to read:
§ 4234b. EPHEDRINE AND PSEUDOEPHEDRINE
(a) Possession.
(1) No person shall knowingly and unlawfully possess a drug product
containing ephedrine base, pseudoephedrine base, or phenylpropanolamine
base with the intent to use the product as a precursor to manufacture
methamphetamine or another controlled substance.
(2) A person who violates this subsection shall:
(A) if the offense involves possession of less than nine grams of
ephedrine base, pseudoephedrine base, or phenylpropanolamine base, be
imprisoned not more than one year six months or fined not more than
$2,000.00 $500.00, or both; and
(B) if the offense involves possession of nine or more grams of
ephedrine base, pseudoephedrine base, or phenylpropanolamine base, be
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 26 of 35
imprisoned not more than five two years or fined not more than $100,000.00
$5,000.00, or both.
(b) Sale.
(1) A drug product containing ephedrine base, pseudoephedrine base, or
phenylpropanolamine base shall not be distributed at retail to the general
public unless it is maintained in a locked display case or behind the counter out
of the public’s reach.
(2)(A) A retail establishment shall not knowingly complete a sale to a
person if the drug product or combination of drug products purchased would
surpass a total of more than 3.6 grams within a 24-hour period or nine grams
within a 30-day period of ephedrine base, pseudoephedrine base, or
phenylpropanolamine base or their isomers.
(B) This subdivision (2) shall not apply to drug products dispensed
pursuant to a valid prescription.
(3) A person or business that violates this subdivision shall:
(A) for a first violation, be assessed a civil penalty of not more than
$100.00; and
(B) for a second and subsequent violation, be assessed a civil penalty
of not more than $500.00.
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 27 of 35
(c) Electronic registry system.
(1)(A) Retail establishments shall use an electronic registry system to
record the sale of products made pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. The
electronic registry system shall have the capacity to block a sale of
nonprescription drug products containing ephedrine base, pseudoephedrine
base, or phenylpropanolamine base that would result in a purchaser exceeding
the lawful daily or monthly amount. The system shall contain an override
function that may be used by an agent of a retail establishment who is
dispensing the drug product and who has a reasonable fear of imminent bodily
harm to his or her the person or to another person if the transaction is not
completed. The system shall create a record of each use of the override
mechanism.
(B) The electronic registry system shall be available free of charge to
the State of Vermont, retail establishments, and local law enforcement
agencies.
(C) The electronic registry system shall operate in real time to enable
communication among in-state users and users of similar systems in
neighboring states.
(D) The State shall use the National Precursor Log Exchange
(NPLEx) online portal or its equivalent to host Vermont’s electronic registry
system.
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 28 of 35
(2)(A) Prior to completing a sale under subsection (b) of this section, a
retail establishment shall require the person purchasing the drug product to
present a current, valid, government-issued identification document. The retail
establishment shall record in the electronic registry system:
(i) the name and address of the purchaser;
(ii) the name of the drug product and quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, and phenylpropanolamine base sold in grams;
(iii) the date and time of purchase;
(iv) the form of identification presented, the issuing government
entity, and the corresponding identification number; and
(v) the name of the person selling or furnishing the drug product.
(B)(i) If the retail establishment experiences an electronic or
mechanical failure of the electronic registry system and is unable to comply
with the electronic recording requirement, the retail establishment shall
maintain a written log or an alternative electronic record-keeping mechanism
until the retail establishment is able to comply fully with this subsection (c).
(ii) If the region of the State where the retail establishment is
located does not have broadband Internet access, the retail establishment shall
maintain a written log or an alternative electronic record-keeping mechanism
until broadband Internet access becomes accessible in that region. At that time,
the retail establishment shall come into compliance with this subsection (c).
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 29 of 35
(C) A retail establishment shall maintain all records of drug product
purchases made pursuant to this subsection (c) for a minimum of two years.
(3) A retail establishment shall display a sign at the register provided by
NPLEx or its equivalent to notify purchasers of drug products containing
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine base that:
(A) the purchase of the drug product or products shall result in the
purchaser’s identity being listed on a national database; and
(B) the purchaser has the right to request the transaction number for
any purchase that was denied pursuant to this subsection (c).
(4) A person or retail establishment that violates this subsection shall:
(A) for a first violation, be assessed a civil penalty of not more than
$100.00; and
(B) for a second or subsequent violation, be assessed a civil penalty
of not more than $500.00.
(d) Applicability. This section shall not apply to a manufacturer that has
obtained an exemption from the Attorney General of the United States under
Section 711(d) of the federal Combat Methamphetamine Epidemic Act of
2005.
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 30 of 35
(e) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Distributor” means a person, other than a manufacturer or
wholesaler, that sells, delivers, transfers, or in any manner furnishes a drug
product to any person that is not the ultimate user or consumer of the product.
(2) “Knowingly” means having actual knowledge of the relevant facts.
(3) “Manufacturer” means a person that produces, compounds,
packages, or in any manner initially prepares a drug product for sale or use.
(4) “Wholesaler” means a person, other than a manufacturer, that sells,
transfers, or in any manner furnishes a drug product to any other person for the
purpose of being resold.
Sec. 12. 18 V.S.A. § 4235 is amended to read:
§ 4235. HALLUCINOGENIC DRUGS
(a) Definition. “Dose” of a hallucinogenic drug means that minimum
amount of a hallucinogenic drug, not commonly used for therapeutic purposes,
that causes a substantial hallucinogenic effect. The Department of Health shall
adopt rules that establish doses for hallucinogenic drugs. The Department may
incorporate, where applicable, dosage calculations or schedules, whether
described as “dosage equivalencies” or otherwise, established by the federal
government.
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 31 of 35
(b) Possession.
(1) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing a hallucinogenic
drug, other than lysergic acid diethylamide, shall be imprisoned not more than
one year six months or fined not more than $2,000.00 $500.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing 10 or more doses of
a hallucinogenic drug, other than lysergic acid diethylamide, shall be
imprisoned not more than five two years or fined not more than $25,000.00
$2,000.00, or both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing 100 or more doses of
a hallucinogenic drug, other than lysergic acid diethylamide, shall be
imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or
both.
(4) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing 1,000 or more doses
of a hallucinogenic drug, other than lysergic acid diethylamide, shall be
imprisoned not more than 15 years or fined not more than $500,000.00, or
both.
(c) Selling or dispensing.
(1) A person knowingly and unlawfully dispensing a hallucinogenic
drug, other than lysergic acid diethylamide, shall be imprisoned not more than
three years or fined not more than $25,000.00, or both. A person knowingly
and unlawfully selling a hallucinogenic drug, other than lysergic acid
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 32 of 35
diethylamide, shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more
than $25,000.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing 10 or more
doses of a hallucinogenic drug, other than lysergic acid diethylamide, shall be
imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or
both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing 100 or
more doses of a hallucinogenic drug, other than lysergic acid diethylamide,
shall be imprisoned not more than 15 years or fined not more than
$500,000.00, or both.
Sec. 13. 18 V.S.A. § 4235a is amended to read:
§ 4235a. ECSTASY
(a) Possession.
(1) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing Ecstasy shall be
imprisoned not more than one year six months or fined not more than
$2,000.00 $500.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing Ecstasy in an
amount consisting of two grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing Ecstasy shall be imprisoned
not more than five two years or fined not more than $25,000.00 $2,000.00, or
both.
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 33 of 35
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing Ecstasy in an
amount consisting of 20 grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing Ecstasy shall be imprisoned
not more than 10 years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or both.
(4) A person knowingly and unlawfully possessing Ecstasy in an
amount consisting of seven ounces or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing Ecstasy shall be imprisoned
not more than 20 years or fined not more than $500,000.00, or both.
(b) Selling or dispensing.
(1) A person knowingly and unlawfully dispensing Ecstasy shall be
imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $25,000.00, or
both. A person knowingly and unlawfully selling Ecstasy shall be imprisoned
not more than five years or fined not more than $25,000.00, or both.
(2) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing Ecstasy in
an amount consisting of two grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing Ecstasy shall be imprisoned
not more than 10 years or fined not more than $100,000.00, or both.
(3) A person knowingly and unlawfully selling or dispensing Ecstasy in
an amount consisting of 20 grams or more of one or more preparations,
compounds, mixtures, or substances containing Ecstasy shall be imprisoned
not more than 20 years or fined not more than $500,000.00, or both.
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 34 of 35
Sec. 14. 18 V.S.A. § 4237 is amended to read:
§ 4237. SELLING OR DISPENSING TO MINORS; SELLING ON SCHOOL
GROUNDS
(a) Dispensing regulated drugs to minors. A person knowingly and
unlawfully dispensing any regulated drug to a minor person under 21 years of
age who is at least three years that person’s junior shall be sentenced to a term
of imprisonment of not more than five years.
(b) Sale of regulated drugs. A person knowingly and unlawfully selling
any regulated drug to a minor shall, in addition to any other penalty, be
sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not more than 10 years.
(c) Selling on school grounds. No person shall knowingly and unlawfully:
(1) dispense or sell a regulated drug to any person on a school bus or on
real property owned by a public or private elementary, secondary, or
vocational school;
(2) sell a regulated drug to any person on real property abutting real
property owned by a public or private elementary, secondary, or vocational
school; or
(3) dispense a regulated drug to any person in public view on real
property abutting real property owned by a school.
(d) Abutting school property. The selling or dispensing of a regulated drug
to a person on property abutting school property is a violation under this
VT LEG #385227 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.284
2026 Page 35 of 35
section only if it occurs within 500 feet of the school property. Property shall
be considered abutting school property if:
(1) it shares a boundary with school property; or
(2) it is adjacent to school property and is separated only by a river,
stream, or public highway.
(e) Penalty. A person who violates subsection (c) of this section shall, in
addition to any other penalty, be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not
more than 10 years.
(f) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Minor” means a person under the age of 18 years of age.
(2) “Owned by a school” means owned, leased, controlled, or
subcontracted by a school and used frequently by students for educational or
recreational activities.
Sec. 15. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385227 v.1